Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

§325-1 Diseases or conditions declared
communicable or dangerous to public health. The director of health by
rules adopted pursuant to chapter 91, may declare diseases or conditions to be
communicable or dangerous to the public health. [L 1911, c 125, §3; RL 1925,
§934; RL 1935, §1093; RL 1945, §2304; am L 1949, c 53, §29; RL 1955, §49-1; HRS
§325-1; am L 1969, c 152, §1; am L 1981, c 185, §1; am L 1983, c 124, §16; am L
1987, c 265, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next